Diagnostic Findings Associated with M alformed Frogs from Verm ont Summer 1997 Fina l Rep ort In Fulfillmen t of Milesto nes for: Investigation of Deformities in the Northern Leopard Frog (Rana Pipiens) at Selected Sites in Vermont - FY 97 Radiographic Characterization of Abnormal Frogs at Selected Si tes in Vermont-FY 97 Biological Resources Division U.S. Geological Survey National Wildlife Health Center Carol U. Meteyer Ac know ledgm ents: Report development: Cathy Pourchot- Acker Technical assistance with radiographs: Nat han Ramsay Necropsy technical assistance: Dottie Johnson, Matt McCollum, Nathan Ramsay, Kathleen Graber, Janna Kottke Microbiological assistance: Doug Docherty, Rebecca Cole, Mark Wolcott, Connie Roderick, Brenda Berlowski, Tina Jaquish, Renee Long Field assistance: Vermont Agency of Natural Resources, USFWS ., Kathryn Converse Graphics assistance and illustrati ons: Kathryn Converse, Harry Rihn, Cathy Acker Data base and reference assistance: Kathy Wesenberg Inform ation pr esented here as well as the organ izationa l schem es and table form ats are no t to be used or applied to other field /patho logy da ta witho ut the pe rmissio n of the patho logist.
TABLE OF CONTENTS SUMMARY . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
4 BACKGROUND . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
5 DEFINING THE PROBLEM . . . .
M orph oge nesis . . . . . . . . . .
Malformation vs. Deformation Ter atog enesis . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
6 7 7 7 FINDINGS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
PHYSICAL CHARACTERISTICS OF FROGS WITH SIMILAR MALFORMATIONS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Deformations . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Trauma (8) Malformations . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Amelia (9) Polymelia (9) Hemimelia (10) Abnormal feet or missing digits (Ectrodactyly or Brac Rotation of long bones and skin webbing (12) Craniofacial abnormalities / Body conformation (12) Normal (12) INTERPRETATION OF DATA . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
MO RPH OLO GIC F INDIN GS IN F ROG S FRO M E ACH STUD Y Alburg Dune . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Poultney River . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Lapans Bay . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Missisquoi NWR . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
DETERMINATION OF BODY CONDITION . . . . . . . . . . . . .
HISTOPATHOLOGY FINDINGS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
RADIOGRAPHIC FINDINGS . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
RESULTS OF MICROBIOLOGICAL TESTING . . . . . . . . . . .
Parasitology . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Bacteriology: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Virology . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
...........
8 ...........
8 ...........
8 ...........
9 hydactyly) (11) ....
SITE : ....
....
....
....
....
....
....
....
....
....
.... ... . ... ... ... ... ... ... ... ... ... ... ... . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
13 13 14 15 16 17 17 18 18 18 18 19 19 FUTURE WORK . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
19 3 APPENDICES APPENDIX A: AP PE ND IX B : DEFINITIONS ................................................................20 Quick Resp ons e Gra nt Pr opo sals And Progress Report ...................................................22 STUDY PLAN..........
.......................................................27 RADIOGRAPHIC/NEC ROPSY FINDING S............................31 Enlargements of Report Radiographs and Tables.......................37 TABLE #1 Frog Body Condition/Average by Deformity..........................42 TABLE #2 Frog Body Condition Average by Collection Site....................45 HISTOPATHOL OGY FINDINGS........................................49 BACTERIOLOGY AND PARASITOLOGY Raw Data Spread Sheets....................................................60 Lim b M easu rem ents Raw Data Spread Sheets...................................................63 REFERE NCES ...............................................................70 NECROPSY REP ORTS.....................................................72 APPEND IX C: APPEND IX D: APP END IX E: APPEND IX F: APPEND IX G: APPENDIX H: AP PE ND IX I: APPEND IX J: APPEND IX K: 4 I. SUMMARY Ninety three frogs were submitted for evaluation.
Frog malformations were classified into 6 major categories and 12 subcategories based on necropsy observations of 72 frogs (Appendix J) and the findings of radiographs performed on 69 of thes e 72 frog s (App endix D ).
Although there were no Vermont frogs with rotation as its primarily malformation rotations did occur in relation w ith other m alform ations an d did res emb le som e of the M inneso ta rotations .
Rotations were most likely to occur in frogs with ectrodactyly or brachydactyly (missing or shortened digits) suggesting that errors in the bone formation was occurring proximal to the affected d igits (4 frogs).
L imb r otation also occur red in tw o frogs with fem oral hem imelia of the opp osite limb and in the sa me lim b as tibiafibula r hem imelia in a nother frog.
It appeared that the more proximal the source of rotational abnormality (ie femur vs tibiafibula), the m ore sev erely the prope lling surfac e deviate d from the norm .
Limb Rotation n= 7; (right lim b= 2, left limb= 5) M issisquoi 14 897- 00 4, 006, 0 11; Po ultney R iver 14 895-0 01, 005 , 008, 01 0.
AVERAGES OF FROGS WITH ROTATION Snout to vent length n=7: 3.32 cm Weight n=7: 2.26 gm Body condition n=6: 1.17 f. Craniofacial abnormalities / Body conformation Although jaw and skull malformations have been common in other states, none were seen in the submissions from Ver mo nt.
One of the frogs from Alburg D une (14896-011) was runted with possible compression of the vertebrae.
14895-010 Short com pressed (runted) body type (n=1 ; only with full assessments) Snout to vent length: 2.6 cm Weight: 1.3 gm Body condition: 1 12 g. Normal Norm al frogs varied in size between sites.
The average weight and length of normal frogs from M ud Creek, which was the control site, were 4.35 gm and 3.97 cm respectively, average measures for weight and length of normal frogs fro m sites w ith malfo rma tions w ere A lburg D une: w eight 2.0 g m an d 3.97 c m an d aver age w eight and length of norm al frogs su bm itted from Lapa ns Ba y we re 1.4 gm and 2.6 cm re spective ly. AVERAGES FOR NORMAL FROGS FROM CONTROL SITE M ud Creek 14899-001, 002, 003, 004, 005, 006 Snout to vent length 3.97 cm Weight 4.35 gm Bod y cond ition 3.7 AVERAGES FOR NORMAL FROGS FROM SITES WITH MALFORMATIONS Alburg Dune : 14896- 012, 013, 015 Snout to vent length: 3.13 cm Weight 2.0 gm Body condition 1 (recorded in 012 only) Lapans Bay : 14898-015 Snout to vent length: 2.6 cm Weight: 1.4 gm Bod y cond ition: (not rec orded ) Missisquoi NWR and Poultney River No N ormal frogs submitted3.
INTERPRETATION OF DATA Although the number of frogs submitted from each site was low, it seems important to look at the data to see if there was an association between malformation type and body condition.
The potential impact a particular abnormalities migh t have on frog suc cess, as re presen ted by ge neral bo dy con dition or n utritional statu s, migh t also be acc essible through data analysis.
Data from the field studies will be needed to determine if the malformations submitted from each site for this study were truly representative of the population in both malformation type and frequency of malfo rma tions pre sent.
Although data should be corrected for population variation due to site variables as well as for weight bias secondary to absence of body parts in particular abnormalities, I feel looking at the frog morphology data, as in this scatter diagram, could provide insight into the association between the type of abnormality in the frog and body condition of those frogs, represented by the frog's weight in relation to length.
The average body condition for all of the types of m alform ations w as poo r to em aciated w ith the exce ption of fro gs with amelia that were all very emaciated.
B. MO RP HO LO GIC FIN DIN GS IN F RO GS FRO M EA CH STU DY SITE : Malformations from Vermont were 93% reduction malformations (amelia, hemimelia or ectrodactyly).
Only 3 frogs submitted with malformations evaluated had an abnormality that did not involve truncation of a limb.
(R. Brann ian, National W ildlife Health Center, pers. com m., 19 97; J. H elgen, M inneso ta Pollution Con trol Ag ency, p ers. com m., 19 97).
The causes of the rise in amphibian deformities remain unclear, however, a number of hypotheses are presently being researched including: xenobiotic chemicals, parasites, and UV-B light.
Some researchers have indicated that classifying the types of abnorm alities on a site will be helpful in isolating the causal agent or agents (C. M eteyer, NW HC , pers. com m., 19 97).
In 1997, 19 sites in the Lake Champlain Basin in Vermont were surveyed for frog deformities.
Rates greater than three percent were observed at 17 of the sites.
Rates overall ranged from 0-45% and averaged approximately 8% (R. Levey, State of Vermont, pers. comm., 1997).
A BRD Quick Initiative Grant of $8000 awarded to this project allowed the National Wildlife Health Center to conduct a workup of the abnormal frogs collected in Vermont.
The workup included classification of abno rma lities, histopatho logy, ne crops y, virolo gy, bac teriology , and par asitology .
The re sults of this wor k sugg ested that the re wa s no cor relation b etwee n viruse s, bacteria , or para sites and the frog abn orm alities obser ved in Vermont (C. M eteyer, NWH C, pers. comm., 1997).
What the work did not include, due to insufficient funds, was skeletal analysis through radiology.
This additional work should clarify whether the abnormalities observed are deform ities, caused by traum a or disea se, or m alform ations, cau sed by a disfunctio n in deve lopm ent. Th e wo rk sho uld also serve to diagnose any skeletal abnormalities not externally observable.
Objective : To determine through radiology of frogs collected in Vermont in 1997 whether the abnormalities observed are developmental in nature or trauma induced, as well as to diagnose skeletal abnormalities not externally observable.
Exp ected P rodu cts : A written report of the project findings will be prepared.
The work will be presented at professional meetings and will be incorporated into peer-reviewed literature.
Con tact: Laura Eaton-Poole, USFW S, New E ngland Field Office, 22 Bridge Street, Concord, NH 03301.
Tel. 603-225-1411, fax 603-225-1467, email laura_eaton@fws.gov.
BRD Science Center: Dr. Katherine Converse of the National Wildlife Health Center is the recommended investigator.
Dr. Converse has been involve d in evalu ating abn orm al frogs in M inneso ta, and she participate d in the frog survey in Ver mo nt in 1997 .
She is still in the process of evaluating abnormal frogs collected in Vermont.
Some of the findings were presented at the workshop sponsored by the National Institute of Environmental Health Sciences on December 4, 1997.
24 Amount Requested: 70 frogs at $25.00/frog ..........................................................$1,750.00 Analysis and report ..........................................................$ 250.00 Total $2,000.00 Literature Cited Dubois, R. B. 1996.
Recent observations of deformed anurans in Wisconsin.
NAAM P III - the North American Amp hibian Monitoring Program Third Annual Meeting: A Meeting to Present, Evaluate, and Discuss Amphibian Monitoring Techniques for North America, World Wide Web Conference, November 14, 1996-February, 1997.
Hopp e, D.M .
1996.
Historical observations and recen t species diversity of deformed anur ans in Minne s ota .
NA AMP III - the North American Amphibian Monitoring Program Third Annual Meeting: A Meeting to Present, Evaluate, and Discuss Amphibian Monitoring Techniques for North America, World Wide Web Conference, November 14, 1996February, 1997.
Tietge, J. 1996.
National reporting center for amphibian deformities.
NAAMP III - the North American Am phibian Monitoring Program Third Annual Meeting: A Meeting to Present, Evaluate, and Discuss Amphibian Monitoring Techniques for North America, World Wide Web Conference, November 14, 1996-February, 1997.
25 APPENDIX B: PROGRESS REPORT FOR USGS-BRD PROJECTS FUNDED BY EASTERN REGION QUICK RESPONSE MONEY PROJECT LEADER: USGS-BRD ORGANIZATION: Dr. C arol U. M eteyer, Dr. K athryn Co nverse National Wildlife Health Center - Madison PROJECT TITLE: Radiographic Characterization of Abnormal Frogs from Selected Sites in Vermont PROJECT COSTS: $ 2,000 Malformations of Vermont frogs collected during the summer of 1997 were characterized during necropsy examination, and lab tests wer e perfo rme d to deter mine if there we re assoc iations betw een diag nostic findin gs and malfo rma tions.
Following that study, we obtained ultradetail radiographic equipment which provided very detailed and magnified images of bone changes in the frogs.
Given this new capability, quick response money was requested and provided in 1998 for a retrosp ective rad iograp hic study of these fro gs to see if ther e wer e specific bo ne cha nges u nique fo r frogs c ollected in Vermont or at specific sites in Vermont.
Radiographs of 33 frogs collected in 1997 from 4 Verm ont sites have been perfor med and inter pretation of these rad iograp hic chan ges is com plete.
Res ults of these find ings are in the attache d data table w hich inclu des a un ique class ification system develo ped thr ough insight gain ed from radiog raphic imag es.
This tab le combines description of necropsy and radiographic findings.
At this time we are determining significance of the radiographic findings based on malformation type and geographic distribution of the frogs.
A final report will be sent by December 31, 1998 to the USGS -BRD E astern Regional Office, USFW S Region 5, and the Vermont Agency of Natural Resources after the radiographic findings are incorporated into the overall final report for the Vermont study.
We are currently looking for funding to extend this study to include microscopic characterization of bone changes with comparison to gross and radiographic findings in an effort to more completely delineate factors that might be contributing to the prod uction o f malfo rma tions at the cellu lar level.
26 APPENDIX C : U.S. Geological Survey Biological Resources Division NATIONAL WILDLIFE HEALTH CENTER 6006 Schroeder Road Madison, Wisconsin 53711 Phone: 608-271-4640 STUDY PLAN Study Plan: Investigation of deformities in the northern leopard frog (Rana pipiens) at selected sites in Vermont.
Malformations of the hip were also seen in some of the Vermont frogs and these would not have been detected without the use of high detail radiography.
Radiographs were also helpful in differentiating trauma from malfo rma tion, althou gh nec ropsy observ ations an d histopa thology were also imp ortant in ru ling out trau ma. Histopathology was performed on 19 frogs (Appendix G).
Histopathology on malformed bones showed two general types of bone changes.
One of the characteristic types of microscopic change seen at the termination of the malfo rme d limb was v ery diso rganiz ed and hyper plastic cartilag e that wa s not ossifyin g norm ally and inte rfered with the formation of bone cortex.
The second type of bone change seen at the point of termination was the formation of sma ll nests of end osteal type cartilage m atrix w ith som e orga nization b ut no ob vious m aturation or ossification .
None of the malformed limbs had inflammation and they often had very poor skeletal muscle development at the term inal end.
T raum atic am putation s did hav e micr oscop ic eviden ce of skele tal mus cle necr osis and inflamm ation.
There were no microscopic changes in internal organs that could be related to malformations.
The brain and spinal cord of the frogs submitted often had dilated ventricles and we are in the process of consulting with a neuropathologist to determine the significance of this finding.
Virology cultures were conducted on 51 tissues on 2 different cell lines adapted for amphibians and electron microscopy was performed on selected homogenates of frog tissues to determine if viruses were present.
No viruses were isolated or identified in any Vermont frogs.
Bacterial cultures were performed on 44 tissues and 98 bacteria were isolated and identified.
There did not appear to be any direct association between bacterial isolates and the observed malformations.
Parasitologic examinations were conducted on 14 frogs.
Although the parasitology sample size was small, no association could be found between the presen ce of m etacerc aria and the occu rrenc e of m alform ations.
II.
BACKGROUND During the summer of 1995, a group of school children conducting a wetland nature study observed a high rate of abnormal leopard frogs in Henderson County, Minnesota.
Since 1995, occurrence of deformed frogs have been reported in 42 states and 3 Canadian provinces (Gilbertson).
The species reported have included northern leopard frog (Rana pipiens), spring peeper (Hyla crucifer), American toad (Bufo americanus), gray treefrog (Hyla versicolor), bullfrog (Rana catesbeiana ), wood frog (Rana sylvatica ), green frog (Rana clamitans), pickerel frog (Ran a palustris ), and mink frog (Ran a septen trionalis ).
Studies, funded by the USGS Biological Resource Division's Eastern Region in coordination with the Vermont Age ncy of N atural R esour ces, and the U.S .
Fish an d W ildlife Serv ice, we re initiated thr ough the Na tional W ildlife Health Center in the summer of 1997.
The objectives of the study were to characterize frog abnormalities, document the distribu tion of m alform ed frog s, determ ine the freq uency of ma lform ations, collec t baseline m orph om etric measurement of frogs, and collect water and sediment samples for analysis.
The National Wildlife Health Center (NWHC) was requested to assist in defining the developmental problems in Vermont frogs.
The role of the NWHC was to perform diagnostic assessments of abnormal and normal frogs from Vermont sites that were known to have malformed frogs.
The diagnostic evaluation included gross necropsy examination, histopathology, virology, bacteriology, parasitology.
In the spring of 1998 funding became available to perform radiology on a subset of the Ver mo nt frogs.
A report of preliminary findings was presented at the NIH/NIEHS Workshop on Strategies for Assessing the Implications of Malformed Frogs for Environmental Health held December 4-5, 1997 at the National Institute of Environmental Health Sciences, Research Triangle Park, North Carolina.
The data we presented at the conference made it clear that teratogenesis was occurring in tadpoles of the northern leopard frog.
Factors that have been shown in the lab to cause teratogenesis are numerous falling into the general categories of genetic or environmental.
Some environmental factors that can influence development are; chemical, thermal, infectious, or trauma-related factors such as UV radiation which can cause cell damage.
Tadpoles are free-living postembryonic organisms that achieve all of their intricate developmental milestones without the pro tection of a sh ell or uteru s.
The en vironm ent in w hich thes e tadpo les deve lop is com plex an d dyn amic .
Sorting out the significant physical and chemical (molecular) factors that are contributing to teratogenesis in the frogs from those facto rs that are c oincide ntally pre sent in the en vironm ent with out direc t effect is impo rtant.
M alform ations can indicate a ge neral tim e fram e durin g wh ich factor s are influe ncing th e teratog enic pro cess.
Knowledge of the possible developmental stages that have incorporated an error can provide guidance in choosing appropriate times for collecting field samples for chemical analysis and guide researches in developing bioassays that mimic the timing of factors present in the field.
Careful characterization and categorization of malformations occurring in the frogs can provide clues to potential causes through comparison with similar malformations that have been produced in lab experiments.
Some of these laboratory experiments involving development date back as far as 1929 (Vogt).
However, associations based on morphologic evidence are circumstantial and without further field and lab analy ses, con clusions canno t be draw n rega rding th e cause s of ma lform ations.
To determine the causes of malformations, agents will need to be identified in the field at appropriate developmental times, and in the appropriate geographic locations in relation to occurrence of malformations.
The agents must be capab le of consiste ntly pro ducing com parab le lesions in ap prop riate spec ies of frogs .
Lab ex perim ents w ill need to take into consideration the role played by such variables as timing of exposure, dose and duration of exposure, and interactions between other environmental or host factors in the potential for producing the wide range of malfo rma tions seen in the field.
La borato ry resu lts will need to be repr oduc ible und er field con ditions.
6 III.
DEFINING THE PROBLEM The pathology of many of malformed frogs is obvious, the cause is not.
Syndromes like these ha ve not be en clear ly defined in frogs an d even the directio n to look fo r answ ers is unde r deba te. Thes e chan ges are not prod uced b y a sudd en and catastrop hic insult.
Malformations represent the end point in a developmental process that incorporated an error long befo re the ex ternal m anifestation of patholo gy. W hat are the errors in development and what questions can we ask to clarify the possible causes of these errors? A. M orph ogen esis Fro m the time an egg is fertilized , an intricate r elationsh ip exists betw een cells an d cell 14897-011 layers w hich giv es rise to ver y orga nized an d highly specialized tissues.
Th is proce ss is called morphogenesis.
Morphogenesis occurs through cell division and proliferation, cell migration, cell differentiation, and programm ed cell death.
Cells divide and proliferate following well defined maps as they move and fold, becoming more differentiated and specialized.
As cell layers interrelate to each other they profoundly influence the growth and character of cells around them.
The timing of this intercellular communication is critical and is thought to be carried out primarily by chemical signals that affect gen etic expr ession.
In limb bud formation, the mesoderm carries all of the information needed to induce a limb as it interacts with the overlying ectoderm.
If the lateral mesodermal plate, represented in this figure, is su rgically tra nsplan ted onto the back of a tadpole, an entire limb will form in response to that committed mesoderm.
During later morphogenesis of the limb the mesoderm is responsible for directing bone formation and the ectoderm is responsible for prov iding the ce llular env ironm ent that allow s the limb to continu e to grow .
B. Malformation vs. Deformation If something goes wrong during morphogenesis and an error occurs in the sequence of cell division, cell migration, cell differentiation or programmed cell death, pathology is likely.
This pathology is called a malformation or a deformation.
Malformations represent primary errors in development; deformations arise later in development and usually result from mechanical factors.
Timing of the error or insult influences both the occurrence and the type of malformation produced.
And the appearance of the malformation can indicate timing.
For example, if the malfo rma tion is an inco mp lete orga n, the factor or insult m ust have occur red du ring a su sceptible p eriod p rior to com plete form ation of that o rgan to halting dev elopm ent. C. Teratog enesis Teratogenesis is simply the name given to the abnormal development that results in malformations.
These errors can involve any level of organ formation; cell division and proliferation, cell migration, cell differentiation, and programm ed cell death.
Teratogenesis can be caused by either genetic or environmental factors (intra-uterine factors in mammals).
Examples of environmental factors include radiation, hyperthermia, low oxygen, high carbon dioxide, poor nutrition and chemicals.
Factors or compounds causing malfo rma tions are c alled terato gens. 7 The same teratogen presented at different developmental ages can initiate different malformations.
However, different teratogens presented at the same developmental age can res ult in similar errors in develo pm ent caus ing the sam e ma lform ation.
IV.
FINDINGS A. PHYSICAL CHARACTERISTICS OF FROGS WITH SIMILAR MALFORMATIONS Du ring July and S eptem ber 19 97, 93 r ecently m etam orph osed leo pard fr ogs w ere sub mitted to the Na tional W ildlife Health Center (NW HC) for diagnostic evaluation.
Frogs were submitted from Alburg Dune (12 abnormal and 6 norm al), Lap ans B ay (14 ab norm al and 6 n orm al), M issisquoi N W R (15 abnor mal an d 6 nor mal), M ud C reek (6 normals), Poultney River (21 abnormal and 7 normal) and shipped, alive, to the NWHC .
Diagnostic methods and proce dures are detailed in the study plan (A ppen dix B).
Necropsy evaluations did not reveal developmental abnormalities in the internal organs of the frogs, although there were renal flukes (most likely Echinostomatae) in various stages of development and inflammation of the cloaca was occasionally seen.
The most common primary abnormalities in these frogs involved the rear legs and examples of these limbs with radiographic detail of the bone changes provide information that assists in classification of the patholo gy as m alform ations or deform ations.
1.
Deformations a.
Trauma Ver y few frogs sub mitted w ere con vincing deform ities or traum a.
Aga in, defor mities ar e not prim ary err ors in development but structural abnormalities that can be caused by mechanical forces, trauma, infectious agents or inflammation.
Gross observations of northern leopard frog 14895-003 from Poultney River indicated a short femur on one side suggesting a malformation.
Radiographs, however, show us that the femur actually has a overriding fracture which is a deformity caused by trauma.
Although frog 14897-003 from Missisquoi is missing a limb, the changes in this limb are consistent with trauma and not a primary error in development.
Characteristic changes associated with trauma include an abrupt end to the leg associated with an irregular depre ssed cen ter and r ed, inflam ed, raised mar gins.
M icrosco pic examination of leg of the frog shown at right (14897-003) showed hem orrha ge, inflam matio n and ac ute necr osis of the sk eletal mu scle surro undin g the end of the fem ur. N o radio graph s wer e availab le from this frog as the limb w as section ed for m icrosco pic evalu ation.
14897-003 Two of the frogs (14896-008, 14897-003) were in fair body condition suggesting recent trauma.
Frogs 14897-013 and 14895-003 were in poor body condition suggesting a more chronic condition.
Trauma n=4; (left=3 right=1) 14895-003 8 Suspect trauma from VT: Alburg Dune 14896-008; Missisquoi 15897-003, 013; Poultney River 14895-003 (femur fracture ).
AV ERAG ES FOR FRO GS WI TH TRAU MA Snout to vent length: 3.35 cm Weight: 2.83 gm Body condition: 2 2.
Malformations The limb abnormalities seen in the Vermont study that represent primary errors in development follow and include; com plete or p artially m issing lim bs, rotation of long bo nes, and skin we bbing
. a.
Am elia This fro g is missin g a limb .
This is a ver y early p rima ry erro r in deve lopm ent.
If we look at the radiograph of one of these frogs with amelia (below 14895-015) we see that not only is the right leg missing, but the right acetabulum (joint for the femur) of the hip also never developed and the two bones (ischium and pubis) are absent.
The hip and hip joint on the opposite side with a normal limb are unremarkable.
There is no evidence of inflammation, fractures or vestigial bones in the regions where the right leg should be.
The limb never developed.
14895-002 Where are the errors in development? The lateral mesodermal plate is responsible for the pelvic development as well as initiating the development of the rear limb.
The lateral mesodermal plate must have been present, as evidenced by the presence of at least a portion of the pelvis on the affected side.
However, there must have been a very early error because 2 of the 3 pelvic bones nev er developed.
A pparent lack of initiation of a limb also suggests an early primary error in the formation of the limb with either an error in the development of the apical ectodermal ridge or in communication between the mesoderm and ectode rm. Radiographs of three frogs with completely missing limbs showed two types of changes.
Two of the frogs radiographed were 14895-015 missing the ischium and the pubis of the pelvis only on the side witho ut the limb , as in the rad iograp h show n abov e.
The other ra diogra phed frog w ith ame lia had all of the p elvic elem ents pre sent.
Frogs with amelia were emaciated.
Amelia n= 6 (right limb = 4, left limb= 2) Alburg dune 14896-007, 009; Lapans Bay 14898-003; Poultney River 14895-002, 006, 015 AV ER AG ES OF FR OG S W ITH AM EL IA Snout to vent length (n=6): 2.93 cm Weight (n=5): 1.76 gm Body condition (n=3): 1 9 b. Polym elia Multiple limbs (n=0) No ne of the V erm ont frog s exam ined by the NW HC in 1997 had m ultiple limb s or m ultiple elem ents asso ciated w ith the limb. c. Hem imelia Tru ncation of the limb sugge sts an erro r prior to the com pletion of lim b deve lopm ent but an error th at prob ably occur red later in develo pm ent than tho se erro rs occu rring in fr ogs w ith ame lia. Frog 14896-003 from Alburg Dune does not have the characteristic changes expected in a traumatized limb.
There is no swelling, redness, inflammation, or irregularity at the termination of these limbs.
There is no scarring and the pigm entation o ver the e nd of the lim b is norm al.
Radiographs of these limbs show no fractures in the segment of femu r that rem ains and the term ination is blun t. Frogs with hemimelia have truncated limbs but the proximal segment of limb that is present is relatively normal.
This is one of 2 types of bone changes seen radiographically in association with truncation of 14896-003 bone s (hem imelia).
If we look at these two radiographs, we see 14896-014 had an abrup t termin ation of the fe mu r witho ut bone reaction similar to that seen in 14896-003.
In the radiograph of 14895-013, however, the distal femur has very abnormal bone development at the end of the bon e with irr egular widen ing of the b one silho uette and increased lacy bone trabeculae traversing the marrow.
There is no attem pt at bone develo pm ent bey ond this ab norm al bone .
The bone changes in 14895-013 suggest that there was an error at the pro gress zo ne; w ith mes oderm al signals; or with comm unication between the ectoderm and mesoderm which eventually stopped growth but may not have stopped as abruptly as 14896-013 14896-014 in 14896-003.
The bone development apparently lost its control and became very irregular abnormal fashion in 14895-013 but it did continue to produce bone.
In 14896-003 and 014, we see no irregular bone growth at the termination, the bone just ends su ggesting a mo re abru pt halt to dev elopm ent.
Microscopically, the proliferative bone changes as seen in 14895-013 confirmed thick, partially ossified trabeculae traversing the marrow w ith irregular and thickened cortices whic h we re som etimes bent at the po int of abno rma l develop men t. Fro gs with a portion of one lim b miss ing w ere gen erally in po or to em aciated b ody co ndition.
Hem imelia : Unilateral n =29 (right limb= 18, left limb=11) Bilateral n= 4; 14896-003 10 Lapans Bay 14898-002, 005, 007, 008, 009, 011, 012, 014.; Missisquoi 14897-006, 008, 009, 010, 011, 012, 014, 017, 022; Alburg dune 14896-003, 005, 006, 010, 014; Poultney River 14895-004, 005, 007, 010, 011, 012, 013, 019, 020, 021 Hemimelia of femur n=11 Hemimelia of tibiafibula n=16 Hemimelia of tibiale and or fibulare n=3 Adactyly n=3 Bilateral hemimelia received counts for each leg for the occurrence of hemimelia, hence the 3 extra malformation design ations ab ove.
In the bilateral hem imelia fro gs, one h ad bilatera l femo ral hem imelia, o ne had a tibiafibula hemimelia and a tibiale/fibulare hemimelia, and the other frog had bilateral adactyly.
AV ER AG ES OF FR OG S W ITH HE M IM EL IA Hemimelia of femur Snout to vent length n=11: 3.25 cm Weight n=11: 2.66 gm Body condition n=7: 1.71 Hem imelia of tibiafibu la = 16 Snout to vent length n=15: 3.27 cm Weight: 2.45 gm Body condition n=11: 1.82 Ad actyly (n=3) Snout to vent length n=2: 3.35 cm Weight n=2: 2.50 gm Bod y cond ition n= 1: 1.0 Hem imelia of tibiale, fibulare (n= 3) Snout to vent length: 3.53 cm Weight n=: 2.73 gm Bod y cond ition (n= 2): 1.0 d. Abnor ma l feet or m issing digits (Ectrodactyly or Brachydactyly) Frog 14895-008 from Poultney River has a short limb and, although difficult to recognize, this disorg anized limb en ds with a structur e resem bling a foo t.
The radiog raph o f this frog sho ws tha t not only is the grow th abno rma l but differen tiation of the bo nes is abn orm al as we ll.
There appears to be abnormal development of the distal tibiafibula and there was 180/ rotation of the tibiafibula that resulted in the tibiale bone in a lateral position and the fibulare bone in medial location.
The tibiale and fibulare are short.
The digit positions are also reversed 180/ (they are aligned in the appropriate order relative to the tibiale and fibulare bones) and phalanges.
These malformations suggests an error in the mesoderm that may ed later in the develo pm ental sequ ence re sulting in ab norm al skeletal elem ents limb only.
14895-008 are missing have o ccurr in the distal 14895-008 Another example of abnormal development of the feet can be seen in the radiograph of frog 1489 5-18.
T here ar e only tw o digits and these w ere w ithin the sam e web of skin.
Th e tibiale and fibu lare bon es are ag ain shor t and cur ved an d there w as no fun ctional ho ck joint.
It is interesting that the mid-shaft of the tibiafibula is also abnormal suggesting that the insult to the bone that caused the error began earlier in bone formation with a more protracted effect than wou ld have been ap preciate d witho ut radiog raphs .
Fro gs in this gro up w ith malfo rma tions of the fee t and digits w ere also g enera lly in poor to ema ciated bo dy con dition.
14895-018 11 Ab norm al deve lopm ent of fee t or digits ; n= 24 (right limb=15, left limb= 9) Lapans Bay 14898-001, 006, 010; Missisquoi 14897-001, 004, 005, 007, 015(adult), 016, 018, 019, 020, 021, 023; Albu rg D une 14 896-0 01 (adu lt), 004, 009 ; Poultne y Rive r 1489 5-001 , 005, 00 8, 009, 0 14, 016 , 018.
AV ERA GE S OF FRO GS W ITH E CT RO DA CT YL Y: (Not including adu lts) Ectro dacty ly (n=17) Snout to vent length (n=12): 3.25 cm Weight (n=12): 2.77 gm Body condition (n=7 recorded): 1.57 Bra chyd actyly (n=4) Snout to vent length: 2.88 cm Weight: 1.88 gm Bod y cond ition: 1 e. Rotation of long bones and skin webbing The radiograph of the Vermont frog shown (14895-010), although missing the distal limb on one side has rotation of the lower limb of the more normal leg with a bend in the bone that is traversed by a "bone bridge".
Rotational abnormalities in the Minnesota frogs were very common.
These rotational abnormalities involved the limb proximal to the hock causing the flexed hock to have either a dorsal or ventral orientation rather than pointing in the more normal medial direction.
Although there were no Vermont frogs with rotation as its primarily malformation rotations did occur in relation w ith other m alform ations an d did res emb le som e of the M inneso ta rotations .
Rotations were most likely to occur in frogs with ectrodactyly or brachydactyly (missing or shortened digits) suggesting that errors in the bone formation was occurring proximal to the affected d igits (4 frogs).
L imb r otation also occur red in tw o frogs with fem oral hem imelia of the opp osite limb and in the sa me lim b as tibiafibula r hem imelia in a nother frog.
It appeared that the more proximal the source of rotational abnormality (ie femur vs tibiafibula), the m ore sev erely the prope lling surfac e deviate d from the norm .
Limb Rotation n= 7; (right lim b= 2, left limb= 5) M issisquoi 14 897- 00 4, 006, 0 11; Po ultney R iver 14 895-0 01, 005 , 008, 01 0.
AVERAGES OF FROGS WITH ROTATION Snout to vent length n=7: 3.32 cm Weight n=7: 2.26 gm Body condition n=6: 1.17 f. Craniofacial abnormalities / Body conformation Although jaw and skull malformations have been common in other states, none were seen in the submissions from Ver mo nt.
One of the frogs from Alburg D une (14896-011) was runted with possible compression of the vertebrae.
14895-010 Short com pressed (runted) body type (n=1 ; only with full assessments) Snout to vent length: 2.6 cm Weight: 1.3 gm Body condition: 1 12 g. Normal Norm al frogs varied in size between sites.
The average weight and length of normal frogs from M ud Creek, which was the control site, were 4.35 gm and 3.97 cm respectively, average measures for weight and length of normal frogs fro m sites w ith malfo rma tions w ere A lburg D une: w eight 2.0 g m an d 3.97 c m an d aver age w eight and length of norm al frogs su bm itted from Lapa ns Ba y we re 1.4 gm and 2.6 cm re spective ly. AVERAGES FOR NORMAL FROGS FROM CONTROL SITE M ud Creek 14899-001, 002, 003, 004, 005, 006 Snout to vent length 3.97 cm Weight 4.35 gm Bod y cond ition 3.7 AVERAGES FOR NORMAL FROGS FROM SITES WITH MALFORMATIONS Alburg Dune : 14896- 012, 013, 015 Snout to vent length: 3.13 cm Weight 2.0 gm Body condition 1 (recorded in 012 only) Lapans Bay : 14898-015 Snout to vent length: 2.6 cm Weight: 1.4 gm Bod y cond ition: (not rec orded ) Missisquoi NWR and Poultney River No N ormal frogs submitted3.
INTERPRETATION OF DATA Although the number of frogs submitted from each site was low, it seems important to look at the data to see if there was an association between malformation type and body condition.
The potential impact a particular abnormalities migh t have on frog suc cess, as re presen ted by ge neral bo dy con dition or n utritional statu s, migh t also be acc essible through data analysis.
Data from the field studies will be needed to determine if the malformations submitted from each site for this study were truly representative of the population in both malformation type and frequency of malfo rma tions pre sent.
Although data should be corrected for population variation due to site variables as well as for weight bias secondary to absence of body parts in particular abnormalities, I feel looking at the frog morphology data, as in this scatter diagram, could provide insight into the association between the type of abnormality in the frog and body condition of those frogs, represented by the frog's weight in relation to length.
The average body condition for all of the types of m alform ations w as poo r to em aciated w ith the exce ption of fro gs with amelia that were all very emaciated.
B. MO RP HO LO GIC FIN DIN GS IN F RO GS FRO M EA CH STU DY SITE : Malformations from Vermont were 93% reduction malformations (amelia, hemimelia or ectrodactyly).
Only 3 frogs submitted with malformations evaluated had an abnormality that did not involve truncation of a limb.
Of the 61 malformations, (4 were bilateral) 10% had no limb on one side, 40% involved abrupt termination of either the femur, tibiafibula or tibiale and fibu lare and 43% had loss o r trunca tion of the dig its.
13 Fro gs from Miss isquoi ha d the m ost com plete limb develo pm ent with truncatio ns involv ing the low er limb distal to the femur.
Frogs from Poultney River and Alburg Dune (although fewer number of total frogs were submitted from Alburg Dune) had the most severe truncations with the primary abnormalities involving apparent lack of any initiation of lim b (am elia) or trun cation of the limb at the fe mu r (fem oral hem imelia).
A verag e body condition in frogs from all of the study sites was poor to emaciated.
Frogs with no apparent malformations (controls) collected at the study sites also we re in poo r to fair bod y cond ition but the sa mp le size wa s too sm all to mak e an extr apolation to the overall population of leopard frogs at these sites.
This ch art of association of severity of malformation with site of collection might suggest errors occurring either at different developmental stages in frog development, or different dose or duration of exposure to a teratogen.
1.
Alburg Dune ALBURG DUNE (14896) Total Frogs with malformed rear limbs : 11 Am elia : 2 = 18% of all malformations from Alburg Dune Hem imelia (one frog was b ilateral): 6 = 55% of all malformations from Alburg Dune and 67% involved the femur Ab norm al feet or d igits : 3 = 27% of all malformations from Alburg Dune Trauma : 1 Primary Site Malformation: Rear leg hem imelia / ectrom elia 4 femur, 2 tibiafibula, 3 digits or phalanges
This re presen ted 27% of all long bo ne hem imelia submitted from Vermont (femur or tibiafibula) and 13% of ma lform ations sub mitted th at had m issing digits or phalanges.
Althoug h only 2 frogs from Alburg D une had com pletely missing limbs, this represented 33% of all of the amelia submitted from Vermont.
One frog (14896-011) had stunted body composition.
Average measurements for malformed frogs from Alburg Dune (n=9) Snout to vent length: 2.99 cm Weight: 1.93 gm Body condition (n=7): 1.86 Ave rage m easure men ts for nor mal co ntrol frog s from Albu rg D une: (n= 3) Sno ut to vent len gth for no rma l frogs: 3.1 3 cm .
Weight of normal frogs: 2.03 gm Body condition (n=1): 1 14 2.
Poultney River POUL TNEY RIVER (14895) Total Frogs with malformed rear limbs: 22 Tota l malfo rm ations: 2 4 (two bilatera l) Am elia : 3 =13% of all malformations from Poultney River Hemimelia (one fro g wa s bilateral): 11 = 46% of all malformations from Poultney River and 55% of these were femur Abn orma l feet or digits: 7 = 32% of all malfor matio ns from Poultn ey Riv er(1 bilater al) Abnormal limb but all bone components present: 3 = 13% of all malformations from Poultney River Trauma : 1 Primary Site Malformation: hem imelia /ectrom elia (6 femur, 3 tibiafibula, 1 tibiale fibulare, 7 digits or phalan ges).
Frogs from this site represented 50% of all Vermont frogs submitted with no obvious limb development (amelia) on one side, and 45% of all long bone hemimelia (femur or tibiafibula) an d 25% of missin g digits or p halang es. W ith the exception of one from Missisquoi with a uniformly short leg, Poultney River was the only site that had frogs submitted with limb malformations representing abnormal bone growth but with all components of the limb repre sented.
T hese fro gs had rotation of th e limb w ith bone bridgin g as the on ly abnormality(as shown in 14895-010); cutaneous fusion between digits 1 and 2 but the bones of these digits were normal; and (14895-017) had a large distorted region of femur with m id-shaft disru ption of the trabecu lae and c ortex w ith the distal limb unrem arkab le.
Averag e measure ments for frogs w ith limb abnorm alities: Snout to vent length (n=20): 3.6 cm Weight (n=21): 2.92 gm Body condition (n=10): 1.3 Average measurements for normal control frogs: (n=0) Abnorm al limbs were truncated at a more proximal site potentially suggesting that developmental errors began earlier in tadpoles at Poultney River.
This site had the mo st apparent errors in initiation (amelia) as well as the most truncations involving the femur.
Although no control frogs were submitted from this site for comparison, the avera ge bod y cond ition of m alform ed frog s from this site is poor to em aciated.
14895-010 15 3.
Lapans Bay LAPAN S BAY (14898) Total Frogs with malformed rear limbs: 12 Total Malformations: 13; one bilateral Am elia : 1 = 8% of all malformations submitted from Lapans Bay Hem imelia /ectrom elia : 7 = 54% of all malformations submitted from Lapans Bay Ab norm al feet or d igits : 5 = 38% of all malformations submitted from Lapans Bay Trauma : None Primary site feature: hem imelia /ectrom elia .
(1 femur, 6 tibiafibula, 1 foot, 3 digits or phalanges).
Amelia at Lapans Bay represented 16% of all of the `97 V erm ont frog s subm itted with no obvious limb development on one side; 32% of all long bone hemimelia (femur or tibiafibula) and 17% of missing digits or phalanges.
(one of the frogs (14898-010) had a tibiale or fibulare missing as well as missing 4 digits so that frog was represented twice in the above malfo rma tion cou nt) Fro gs with rear lim b ma lform ation (148 98- 004 , 013 no t included as these w ere fore limb m alform ations): Snout to vent length (n=12): 3.08 cm Weight (n=12): 2.46 gm Body condition (n=9): 1.89 No rma l control fro g: (n= 1) Snout to vent length: 2.6 cm Weight: 1.4 gm Body condition: not reported but the weight/snout to vent ratio suggests an emaciated frog.
Frogs submitted from Lapans Bay had malformations that represented truncations of all bones of the limb.
One frog had an apparent error in limb initiation.
The single control frog from Lapans Bay and the 12 malformed frogs all had an average of poor to emaciated body condition.
14898-004 had a forelimb malformation.
16 4.
Missisquoi NWR MISSISQU OI (14897) Total frogs with malformed rear limbs : 21 No Bilateral Am elia : 0 Hem imelia /ectrom elia : 7 =3 3% of all malformations submitted from Missisquoi Ab norm al feet or d igits : 13 = 62% of all malformations submitted from Missisquoi Abnormal limb but all bone components present: 1 (all bones are proportionally short) =5% Trauma : 2 Primary site feature: hem imelia /ectrom elia Rear leg ectrom elia (0 femu r, 6 tibiafibula, 1 tibiale fibulare, 2 foot, 11 dig its or phala nges).
It is interesting that all of missing bone components in frogs subm itted from Miss isquoi w ere distal to the femu r. Missisquoi had 3 2% of all long bone hemim elia (most of these involved tibiafibula) and 54 % of missing digits or ph alange s. Average measurements for frogs with limb abnormalities for which measurements were taken: (n=12; accession 002 not included as not a rear limb abnorm ality, 003 was not included because it was classified as traum a): Snout to vent length: 3.27 cm Weight: 2.34 gm Body condition: 1.33 Average measurements for normal control frogs: (n=0) Abn orm al limbs w ere trun cated at a m ore distal site po tentially sugg esting a m alform ation that be gan later in development of the tadpoles at Missisquoi.
Even though the frogs from Missisquoi had less severe malformations than some of the other sites, they were still in poor body condition.
14897-002 had a forelimb malformation.
C. DETERMINATION OF BODY CONDITION Gen eral bod y cond ition assessm ent (goo d, fair, poo r, em aciated) p erform ed at nec ropsy seem ed to m ost accu rately reflect the nutritional status of malformed frogs.
This subjective assessment at necropsy was independent of the affect that the ab norm ality or frog size mig ht have had on weigh t. Wh en m ajor bo dy par ts of the frog were all present, body weight to body length ratios reflect nutrition status of frogs more accurately than body weight alone or snout to v ent length alone as a lar ge frog (length) m ay be em aciated an d have the sam e weig ht as a sm aller frog with good bod y fat stores.
For this study, it was assum ed that sex was not a factor in the body cond ition or size of these immature, recently metamorphosed frogs.
Frogs necropsied very close to the time of tail bud resorption (metamorphosis just completed) may still have fat reserves stored during the tadpole stage.
These frogs would not have experienced the survival pressures placed on a frog that had been required to actively capture food for a longer period of time and the fat stores in these recently metamorphosed frogs could be misleading if used as an indicator of succes s as a frog. 17 D. HISTOPATHOLOGY FINDINGS Histopathology was performed on 19 frogs (Appendix F).
Histopathology on malformed bones showed two general types of bone changes.
One of the characteristics of bone at the termination of the malformed limb was very disorganized and hyperplastic cartilage that was not ossifying normally and interfered with the formation of bone cortex.
The second type of bone change at the point of termination was the formation of small nests of endosteal type cartilage matrix with some organization but no obvious maturation or ossification.
None of the malformed limbs had inflammation and they often had very poor skeletal muscle development.
Traumatic amputations did have micr oscop ic eviden ce of skele tal mus cle necr osis and inflamm ation.
N o cons istent mic rosco pic chan ges w ere seen in internal organs (heart, lung, liver, stomach, intestine, pancreas, kidney, bladder, gonad, spleen, thyroid gland, thymus, lymphoid aggregates) that could be related to malformations.
The brain and spinal cord of the frogs submitted often had dilated ventricles and we are in the process of consulting with a neuropathologist to determine the significance of this finding.
E. RADIOGRAPHIC FINDINGS Radiographs were extremely helpful in determining the degree of malformation in the limbs as well as the type of termination in both long bones and digits.(Appendix D) Malformations of the hip were also seen in some of the Vermont frogs and these would not have been detected without the use of high detail radiography.
Radiographs were also helpful in differentiating trauma from m alformation, although necropsy observations and histopathology were also im portan t in ruling ou t traum a.
F. RESULTS OF MICROBIOLOGICAL TESTING Lab tests were performed on the frogs sent into our lab so that information involving infectious agents could be looked at in relation to malformation types.
1.
Parasitology In an attempt and made an compared to hem imelia o r to look for significance of metacercariae in the frogs, parasitology examined the frogs, cleared them estimate of metacercarial load.
Metacercarial load in frogs from Vermont were relatively heavy, Minnesota frogs; the primary malformations in all Vermont sites were reduction defects such as trunca tion of a lim b wh ich has no t been disc ussed a s a direct seq uelae of m etacerc arial infection .
Parasitologic examination was performed on 14 frogs; with at least 1 normal frog from each site following procedure s outlined in the Study Plan (App endix C).
Skin, subcu taneous tissue, coelom, oral cavity, esophagu s, intestinal serosa, kidney, urinary bladder, fat body, heart/pericardium, and skeletal muscle from the rear leg, back, abdomen, tail bud area were examined for metacercaria.
Metacercariae were most consistently seen in the kidney, how ever this m etacerc aria w as mo rpho logically d istinct (mo st likely Ec hinosto mata e) from the me tacerca ria seen in other locations.
Skin, tail bud, liver, tissue adjacent to eyes, epaxial muscles were also common sites where meta cercar iae (mo st likely D iplostom atidae) w ere fou nd. Th e me tacerca riae table in Appendix H is organized by malformation and, although statistical analysis was not meaningful due to the small numbers, an association between metacercariae and malformation was not obvious.
Metacercariae were present in both normal and malform ed frogs.
Appendix H also contains a table for the adult helminths that were found in these frogs but these are listed for interest and are thought to be incidental findings as there was no pathology associated with these parasites.
18 The hip regio n of a clear ed frog pictured above show s three m etacerc ariae.
2.
Bacteriology: Cultures of liver and kidney from 30 abnormal frogs and 15 normal frogs (45 frogs) were conducted following the protocol outlined in the study plan (Appen dix C).
29 different bacteria were isolated and identified from these frog s; most of them were in the group Enterobacteriaceae and are not usually considered to be primary pathogens.
One important excep tion to this was Aero mon as hyd rophila which was most comm only isolated from frogs collected at Lap ans B ay. Aero mon as hyd rophila is a know n patho gen of am phibian s and re ptiles.
No ne of the fro gs with Aero mon as hyd rophila isolated had evidence of trauma.
The most common isolates from all sites were Alcaligenes xylosidans and Pseu dom onas c epacia and these bacteria were also isolated from norm al control frogs.
No isolates could b e related to malfo rma tions.
3.
Virology Attempts to isolate virus from livers, kidneys, hearts and occasionally skin sampled from 32 abnormal frogs and 19 normal frogs (51 frogs) followed the protocol for virus isolation outlined in the study plan.
No viruses were isolated or identified in negatively stained preparations for electron microscopic in any of the samples from any of the frogs in this study.
Poultney River 14895-001-005 liver, kidney -003-005 gut -008,010 heart -026-028 liver, kidney Alburg Dune 14896-001-005 liver, gut, kidney -008 foot skin -008-010 heart -017,018 liver, kidney, heart Missisquoi 14897-002-005 liver, gut, kidney -003 skin -008-010 heart -024-029 liver, kidney, heart Lapans Bay 14898-001-005 liver, gut kidney -008-010 heart -017-020 liver, kidney, heart Mu d Creek 14899-001-003 liver, kidney -002-004 gut -002 lung -004 heart V. FUTURE WORK Assessm ent of early tadpole developm ent at selected Vermo nt sites.
19 APPENDICES APPENDIX A: AP PE ND IX B : DEFINITIONS ................................................................20 Quick Resp ons e Gra nt Pr opo sals And Progress Report ...................................................22 STUDY PLAN..........
.......................................................27 RADIOGRAPHIC/NEC ROPSY FINDING S............................31 APPEND IX C: APPEND IX D: APPEND IX E: Enlargements of Report Radiographs and Tables.......................37 APPEND IX F: TABLE #1 Frog Body Condition/Average by Deformity..........................42 TABLE #2 Frog Body Condition Average by Collection Site....................45 HISTOPATHOL OGY FINDINGS........................................49 BACTERIOLOGY AND PARASITOLOGY Raw Data Spread Sheets....................................................60 Lim b M easu rem ents Raw Data Spread Sheets...................................................63 REFERE NCES ...............................................................70 NECROPSY REP ORTS.....................................................72 APPEND IX G: APPENDIX H: AP PE ND IX I: APPEND IX J: APPEND IX K: APPENDIX A: DEFINITIONS Des cription o f frog m alform ations in this re port are based o n term inology used in hu man literature (B olande , Rob bins), developmental biology (O'Rahilly; Carlson), and teratology (W ise).
Many of these terms, defined in Appendix B, were originally used to describe defects that are present in the mamm alian fetus at birth.
Direct application of these terms to frogs that metamorphose in a free-living postembryonic state may or may not prove to be appropriate.
However, common terminology may allow recognition of similar conditions by individuals in related specialties involving developmental anomalies across species and bring new interest and collaboration to the issues involving malformed frogs.
The terminology in reference to possible points of error in development (mesodermal versus ectodermal) may be simplistic, but allows an initial attempt at looking at the pathogene sis of some of these malform ations.
Case num ber : National Wildlife Health Center (NW HC) reference number given to a group of frogs submitted from the same site and usually collected in a similar time frame.
Accession number : NW HC reference number given to individual frogs within a case.
Body condition (as defined for this report by M eteyer): Bod y cond ition reflects the nutritiona l state of the frog and is determined by the pathologist by subjective assessment of relative quantity of muscle and body fat present in the frog at the time of necropsy.
Assessment of body condition is independent of absolute weight or snout to vent length.
Body condition has been scored in the following w ay so that averages can be m ade for com parison betwee n sites and abnorm alities; good = 4, fair= 3, poor = 2, em aciated= 1. Good body condition: Ad equate skeletal muscle and abu ndant fat in the fat bodies.
Fair body co ndition: Adequate skeletal mu scle with reduced fat in the fat bodies.
Poor bod y condition: Adequ ate skeletal muscle with scant or no body fat in the fat bodies.
Em aciated body condition: Ske letal muscle wasting and no b ody fat in the fat bodies.
W eight to length ratio (as defined for this report by Meteyer): The weight (gm) of the frog divided by the length (cm) of the snout to vent length of the frog which provides an approxim ation of nutritional status or body con dition as a numerical index value which correlates with body condition as assessed at necropsy.
M orph ogen esis : Developmental process which gives rise to highly organized and specialized tissues through cell division and proliferation, cell migration, cell differentiation, and programmed cell death.
Path ogen esis : Cellular events, reactions and other pathologic m echanisms oc curring in the developm ent of disease M esoderm : The embryonic layer from which connective tissue, bone, cartilage, muscle, blood, vasculature, notochord, pleura, pericardium, peritoneum, kidney, and gonads are derived.
Ectoderm : The embryonic layer from which epidermal tissues (skin, hair, etc.), mucous membranes, nervous tissue, and extern al sense or gans (ey e, ear, etc.) ar e derive d. Malformations: Primary errors in any phase of morphogenesis including cell proliferation, cell migration, differen tiation, pro gram med cell death or regres sion of larv al structur es. Deformations: Deformations arise later in fetal life and represent alterations in form or structure resulting from mec hanica l factors.
The re is no intrin sic defect in m orph ogen esis.
M alformation sequence : cascade of events leading to malformation (IE urethral obstruction may cause secondary affect of rena l mor phog enesis an d ma y lead to de fects in the low er limb s due to co mp ression of blood vessels).
20 Appendix A: Definitions Continued .
Malformation syndrome : single etiologic agent that simultaneously affects several tissues (IE viruses) RCK. Tera togen esis : Abnormal development that gives rise to malformations Teratogen : An agent or factor that causes the production of physical defects in the developing organism (embryo) Hy pop lasia : Incomplete development of an organ Aplasia (agen esis): Lack of development of an organ or tissue often resulting from failure of appearance of the primordium of an organ in embryonic development.
For example, amelia is aplasia or agenesis of a limb.
Ectro me lia : Hypoplasia or aplasia of one or more long bones of limbs.
Types of ectromelia are amelia, hemimelia, and phocomelia.
Ectro dacty ly : Absence of a digit (toe or finger) Brachydactyly: Absence o f phalanx (a bone that com prise the digits) Am elia : No obvious limb development Hem imelia : Developmental anomaly characterized by absence of all or part of the distal half of a limb; fibular hemimelia, tibial hem imelia Pho com elia : Absence of the proximal portion of a limb, IE feet attached to the body by a single small irregularly shaped bone Polym elia : A developm ental anomaly cha racterized by the presence of sup ernum erary limbs.
Sym pod ia : Fusion of lower extremities Skin W eb (as defined for this report by M eteyer): The skin covering the leg traverses at least one joint restricting motion.
Dorsal/ventral pigmentation maintained.
Malformation or deformation of bone is often associated with restricted limb d evelop men t and is seen as rotation of the invo lved bo ne or join t, foresho rtening of the bon e, or fusion of joint.
Rotation (as defined for this report by M eteyer): Deviation of bone or joint causing distal limb to have abnormal orientatio n. 21 APPENDIX B: INVESTIGATION OF DEFORMITIES IN THE NORTHERN LEOPARD FROG (RANA PIPIENS) AT SELECTED SITES IN VERMONT Background and Justification
In the fall of 1996, abnormalities in northern leopard frogs ( Rana pipiens) were observed by the public at 12 sites adjacent to Lake Champlain in Vermont.
Incidences of abnormal leopard frogs were verified at four of these sites by staff of the Vermont Agency of Natural Resources (VTANR ) on October 9, 1996.
The incidence of deformities averaged 16.5 %, ranging from 5-23 % at the four sites (230 frogs observed).
Several of the sites where deformities were observed were near the borders of the Missisquoi National Wildlife Refuge in Swanton, Vermont.
Most of the abnormalities observed were missing legs or feet, but also included eye abnormalities.
Similar observations have been made in at least seven states and two C anadia n prov inces.
T he m ost exten sive w ork to da te has bee n cond ucted in M inneso ta and in the St. Lawrence Valley of Quebec.
The mechanism(s) by which these deformities are occurring have not been identified, however, the predominant theories include: UV-B radiation; xenobiotic contaminants; and viral, bacterial, fungal, or parasitic diseases.
The purpose of this investigation is to take the first steps in examining the abnormalities in the Vermont frogs.
Specifically, this investigation will examine affected frogs from four sites in Vermont, catalogue the external and internal abnormalities, and compare to frogs of an unaffected site in Vermont, as well as abnormal frogs collected from M inneso ta in 1995 and 19 96.
Se lect sam ples w ill be exam ined for virolog y, bacter iology, an d para sitology.
T he ove rall information should verify whether the frogs in Vermont have developmental abnormalities, whether the abnormalities observed in Vermont are the same as those observed in Minnesota, and to begin to determine whether viruses, bacteria, and/or parasites could be respo nsible for the abnorm alities.
Purpo se The purposes of this investigation are several fold: (1) to determine whether the abnormalities observed in northern leopard frogs in Vermont are developmental in nature; (2) to compare abnormal frogs to normal-appearing frogs collected from an expe cted con trol site to verify that there ar e differen ces; (3) to com pare ab norm alities found in Ver mo nt to abnormalities found in Minnesota to determine if they are the same phenomenon; and (4) to determine if a subsample of frogs h arbor viruses, b acteria, or parasites w hich co uld be re spons ible for the ab norm alities obser ved in V erm ont.
Methods For ty north ern leop ard fro g bree ding sites ha ve bee n identified u sing rec ent data fro m re ptile and am phibian atlas wo rk in Ver mo nt. Nor thern leo pard fr og m etam orph s will be co llected from these sites in July , 1997 a s part of a larg er study to determ ine the distrib ution of de form ed leop ard fro gs in Ve rmo nt.
The 40 sites includ e M issisquoi N ational W ildlife Refu ge and the four sites w here V TA NR staff observ ed defo rmities in 1996 .
Fifteen ab norm al-appe aring fro gs from up to four sites, an d five nor mal-a ppear ing from a site expec ted to be un affected w ill be shipped live to the N ational W ildlife Health Center (NWH C) in Madison, Wisconsin.
Frogs will be examined to characterize abnormalities and catalog them using standardized nomenclature and morphologic diagrams.
Routine microbiological samples will be run as necessary on a subset of tissues.
Catalogued data will be used to compare abnormalities in Vermont frogs to those recorded during 1995 and 19 96 M inneso ta frogs.
T issue sam ples w ill be archiv ed for later use if fundin g beco mes available.
Budget Field trip for NW HC staff to document collection sites, demonstrate and coord inate methodolog y for classification of gross abnormalities and collection and shipment of frogs.$1,000 22 Radiography, external examination, necropsy examination, microscopic evaluation of tissues, classification and cataloging of abnormalities.
Virology, bacteriology and/or parasitology on selected samples.$7,000 23 APPENDIX B: USGS/BRD QUICK RESPONSE GRANT PROPOSAL December 16, 1997 Title: Radiography of Abnormal Frogs at Select Sites in Vermont Background Although scientific reports of amphibian deformities have been noted by naturalists and scientists since at least the 1700s (Van Valen 1974), the concurrent geographic extent and rate of deformities appear to have markedly increased in recent years (DuBois 1996; Hoppe 1996; Tietge 1996).
The majority of deformities have involved multiple, fused, or missing hind limbs, however, some recently reported developmental deformities have also included vestigial tails, missing, misplaced or sup ernum erary eyes and ossification abnorm alities
(R. Brann ian, National W ildlife Health Center, pers. com m., 19 97; J. H elgen, M inneso ta Pollution Con trol Ag ency, p ers. com m., 19 97).
The causes of the rise in amphibian deformities remain unclear, however, a number of hypotheses are presently being researched including: xenobiotic chemicals, parasites, and UV-B light.
Some researchers have indicated that classifying the types of abnorm alities on a site will be helpful in isolating the causal agent or agents (C. M eteyer, NW HC , pers. com m., 19 97).
In 1997, 19 sites in the Lake Champlain Basin in Vermont were surveyed for frog deformities.
Rates greater than three percent were observed at 17 of the sites.
Rates overall ranged from 0-45% and averaged approximately 8% (R. Levey, State of Vermont, pers. comm., 1997).
A BRD Quick Initiative Grant of $8000 awarded to this project allowed the National Wildlife Health Center to conduct a workup of the abnormal frogs collected in Vermont.
The workup included classification of abno rma lities, histopatho logy, ne crops y, virolo gy, bac teriology , and par asitology .
The re sults of this wor k sugg ested that the re wa s no cor relation b etwee n viruse s, bacteria , or para sites and the frog abn orm alities obser ved in Vermont (C. M eteyer, NWH C, pers. comm., 1997).
What the work did not include, due to insufficient funds, was skeletal analysis through radiology.
This additional work should clarify whether the abnormalities observed are deform ities, caused by traum a or disea se, or m alform ations, cau sed by a disfunctio n in deve lopm ent. Th e wo rk sho uld also serve to diagnose any skeletal abnormalities not externally observable.
Objective : To determine through radiology of frogs collected in Vermont in 1997 whether the abnormalities observed are developmental in nature or trauma induced, as well as to diagnose skeletal abnormalities not externally observable.
Exp ected P rodu cts : A written report of the project findings will be prepared.
The work will be presented at professional meetings and will be incorporated into peer-reviewed literature.
Con tact: Laura Eaton-Poole, USFW S, New E ngland Field Office, 22 Bridge Street, Concord, NH 03301.
Tel. 603-225-1411, fax 603-225-1467, email laura_eaton@fws.gov.
BRD Science Center: Dr. Katherine Converse of the National Wildlife Health Center is the recommended investigator.
Dr. Converse has been involve d in evalu ating abn orm al frogs in M inneso ta, and she participate d in the frog survey in Ver mo nt in 1997 .
She is still in the process of evaluating abnormal frogs collected in Vermont.
Some of the findings were presented at the workshop sponsored by the National Institute of Environmental Health Sciences on December 4, 1997.
24 Amount Requested: 70 frogs at $25.00/frog ..........................................................$1,750.00 Analysis and report ..........................................................$ 250.00 Total $2,000.00 Literature Cited Dubois, R. B. 1996.
Recent observations of deformed anurans in Wisconsin.
NAAM P III - the North American Amp hibian Monitoring Program Third Annual Meeting: A Meeting to Present, Evaluate, and Discuss Amphibian Monitoring Techniques for North America, World Wide Web Conference, November 14, 1996-February, 1997.
Hopp e, D.M .
1996.
Historical observations and recen t species diversity of deformed anur ans in Minne s ota .
NA AMP III - the North American Amphibian Monitoring Program Third Annual Meeting: A Meeting to Present, Evaluate, and Discuss Amphibian Monitoring Techniques for North America, World Wide Web Conference, November 14, 1996February, 1997.
Tietge, J. 1996.
National reporting center for amphibian deformities.
NAAMP III - the North American Am phibian Monitoring Program Third Annual Meeting: A Meeting to Present, Evaluate, and Discuss Amphibian Monitoring Techniques for North America, World Wide Web Conference, November 14, 1996-February, 1997.
25 APPENDIX B: PROGRESS REPORT FOR USGS-BRD PROJECTS FUNDED BY EASTERN REGION QUICK RESPONSE MONEY PROJECT LEADER: USGS-BRD ORGANIZATION: Dr. C arol U. M eteyer, Dr. K athryn Co nverse National Wildlife Health Center - Madison PROJECT TITLE: Radiographic Characterization of Abnormal Frogs from Selected Sites in Vermont PROJECT COSTS: $ 2,000 Malformations of Vermont frogs collected during the summer of 1997 were characterized during necropsy examination, and lab tests wer e perfo rme d to deter mine if there we re assoc iations betw een diag nostic findin gs and malfo rma tions.
Following that study, we obtained ultradetail radiographic equipment which provided very detailed and magnified images of bone changes in the frogs.
Given this new capability, quick response money was requested and provided in 1998 for a retrosp ective rad iograp hic study of these fro gs to see if ther e wer e specific bo ne cha nges u nique fo r frogs c ollected in Vermont or at specific sites in Vermont.
Radiographs of 33 frogs collected in 1997 from 4 Verm ont sites have been perfor med and inter pretation of these rad iograp hic chan ges is com plete.
Res ults of these find ings are in the attache d data table w hich inclu des a un ique class ification system develo ped thr ough insight gain ed from radiog raphic imag es.
This tab le combines description of necropsy and radiographic findings.
At this time we are determining significance of the radiographic findings based on malformation type and geographic distribution of the frogs.
A final report will be sent by December 31, 1998 to the USGS -BRD E astern Regional Office, USFW S Region 5, and the Vermont Agency of Natural Resources after the radiographic findings are incorporated into the overall final report for the Vermont study.
We are currently looking for funding to extend this study to include microscopic characterization of bone changes with comparison to gross and radiographic findings in an effort to more completely delineate factors that might be contributing to the prod uction o f malfo rma tions at the cellu lar level.
26 APPENDIX C : U.S. Geological Survey Biological Resources Division NATIONAL WILDLIFE HEALTH CENTER 6006 Schroeder Road Madison, Wisconsin 53711 Phone: 608-271-4640 STUDY PLAN Study Plan: Investigation of deformities in the northern leopard frog (Rana pipiens) at selected sites in Vermont.
Background and Justification: In the fall of 1996, deformities in northern leopard frogs (Rana pipiens) were observed by the public at 12 sites adjacent to Lake Champlain in Vermont.
Several sites were near the border of the Missisquoi NWR in Swanton, Vermont.
The presence of deformed leopard frogs were verified at four of these sites by staff of the Vermont Agency of Natural Resources (VTDEC) on October 9, 1996.
The prevalence of deformities averaged 16.5 %, ranging from 5-23 % at the four sites (230 frogs observed).
Most of the frogs observed had missing legs or feet and some had eye abnormalities.
Similar observations have been made in at least seven states and two Canadian provinces.
The most extensive surveys and identification of deformities in frogs and environmental sampling to date has been conduced in Minnesota and the St. Lawrence Valley of Quebec.The mechanism(s) by which these deformities are occurring has not been identified; however, the popular theories include: UV-B radiation; xenobiotic contaminants; and viral, bacterial, fungal, or parasitic diseases.
The purpose of this investigation is to take a first step by completing a clinical examination of deformed frogs collected from four sites in Vermont to complete the following objectives: Objectives: 1.
2.
3.
4.
Characterize and catalog the external and internal deformities in leopard frogs in Vermont; Compare deformed frogs to normal-appearing frogs from an expected control site; Compare morphometric descriptions of abnormalities in Vermont leopard frogs to abnormalities confirmed in Minnesota frogs to determine whether any similarities exist; and Determine the presence or absence of viruses, bacteria, or parasites in deformed frogs.
frogs breed are identified in the recent Vermont reptile and on 12 of these sites; VTDEC staff confirmed the frog deformities be collected from each of the 40 sites.
Four sites with at least this study.
Fifteen abnormal-appearing frogs will be collected frogs will be collected from a control site where no deformities Methods and approach: Forty site where northern leopard amphibian atlas (Andrews, 1995). ).
In 1996, deformed frogs were observed by the public on four of these sites in 1996.
A least 100 frogs will 10% of the frogs appearing abnormal will be selected for from each of these four sites and five normal-appearing were present in a sample of at least 50 frogs.
Recently metamorphosed frogs will be collected and examined for the presence and type of deformities.
Frogs with deformities will be placed in 11 x 32 cm plastic boxes with lids containing 1 air-hole/inch in a chilled cooler or shady location.
Approximately 3 cm of water from the site will be placed in the boxes along with sphagnum moss.
At the completion of frog collection, the plastic boxes will be placed in hard-sided coolers, surrounded on four sides with frozen blue ice containers.
The boxes will be held in place by a washable metal frame.
Eight frogs will be placed live in each container and shipped via overnight service to the National Wildlife Health Center (NWHC).
Upon arrival, frogs will be examined to deter ermine how the frog responds to this abnormality, photographed, the deformities will be characterized and cataloged using nomenclature and morphologic diagrams developed at NWHC based on frogs submitted to NWHC, photographs by the Minnesota Pollution Control Agency (MPCA, Helgen), and a Quebec study (Ouellet, 1997).
Routine histopathological and microbiological samples will be collected and processed on a subset of tissues.
Catalogued data will be used to compare abnormalities in Vermont frogs to those recorded during 1995 and 1996 Minnesota frogs.
Tissue samples or whole frogs will be archived for later use if funding becomes available or a potential agent causing the deformities is identified.
Characterization of abnormalities and Necropsy Examination 1.
Describe clinical condition/function or movement of any deformed limbs, multiple limbs or other grossly apparent deformities..
2.
3.
Photograph abnormalities before the frog is anesthetized or euthanized if possible.
Euthanize one frog at a time using inhalation of Halothane (see NWHC SOP).
4.
Necropsy will be performed with the use of a dissecting scope and 2X head loop.
Frogs are opened with an ventral midline incision.
The heart is collected and a blood smear made.
Tissues for virology will be placed in viral transport media, tissues for bacteriology in vials of broth and tissue for histopathology in formalin.
Very small tissues will be places in embedding bags in formalin.
27 5.
Necropsy set-up and lab distribution of frogs is as follows: Sites 1-4 Case #'s 14895 - 14898 Accessions 001-005, Pathology: 2 blood smears Multiple tissues in formalin and embedding bag Tissues for bacteriology, virology Accessions 006-007, Parasitology: Description of gross pathology Submit whole carcasses in whirl-paks, in saline Accessions 008-010, Virology: Description of gross pathology Blood smear Submit tissues in viral transport media Carcass saved in formalin jar - Hold Accessions 011-013, Bacteriology: Description of gross pathology Blood smear Submit tissues bact broth vial Carcass saved in formalin jar - Hold Accessions 014-015, Hold Frozen: Description of gross pathology Freeze back in whirl-paks Normals, Case # 14899 Accession 001: Pathology (necropsy as above) Accessions 002-003: Virology (necropsy as above) Accessions 004-005: Bacteriology (necropsy as above) Virology 1.
Virus isolation will be attempted in amphibian and fish cell culture.
Liver, spleen, kidney, gut and heart were pooled by like tissues (liver with livers, spleen with spleens) with a maximum of three frogs per pool.
2.
Viral isolates will be identified and characterized.
3.
Electron microscopy will be performed on the pooled tissues in an attempt to detect any viruses that cannot be isolated in cell culture.
Bacteriology Frog tissues consisting primarily of liver, heart, kidney and others will be placed directly into appropriately labeled tubes of tryptic soy broth (TSB) at necropsy and submitted to diagnostic bacteriology.
The following procedure will be followed: 1.
The 10 ml tubes of TSB with tissue will be vortexes for 5-10 seconds and subcultured immediately onto blood agar (BAP), eosine-methylene blue agar (EMB), (or MacConkey agar), Lowenstein-Jensen agar (LJ), sabouraud-dextrose agar (SAB), thioglycollate broth (THIO), and cooked-meat broth (CM).
2.
Media (except LJ and SAB) will be examined at 18-24 hour intervals for up to 72 hours before being discarded as negative.
Positive cultures will be subcultured and identified to at least genus level.
TSB will be subcultured after 24 hours if growth appears.
LJ and SAB will be held as appropriate until sufficient growth develops or there is no growth.
3.
Identification of bacterial isolates will be consistent with current capabilities and will include the use of commercial identification systems; predominately the API system, bioMerieux Vitex, St. Louis, Missouri.
Reference laboratories, primarily the National Veterinary Services Laboratory, Ames, Iowa will be used as needed.
Parasitology To determine the presence and species of parasites or evidence of parasite infections, live or freshly euthanized frogs will be sent to the parasitology laboratory for examination under a dissection scope.
The following procedures will be followed: 1.
Frogs will be skinned and the muscles and fascia examined under the dissecting microscope.
will be teased apart and examined for metacercaria.
Hind limb muscles 2.
Metacercaria in the subdermal layers will be dissected free and placed temporarily in  strength Locke's solution and refrigerated.
In some cases, this will cause the metacercaria to encyst so that fixation and staining can proceed.
Notes will be kept and vial labeled as to collection site for the metacercaria.
3.
A ventral incision will be made from vent to lower mandible to expose internal organs.
28 4.
The heart will be removed and a blood smear made according to DPL SOP. 5.
All organs will be examined grossly, any parasites removed, prepped for fixation and fixed in AFA or 70% depending on the class of parasite.
Most organs are small enough to examine via a squash preparation.
Fat bodies will be examined via squash preparation for mesocercariae.
6.
The body cavity will be examined for immature helminths.
If found they will be removed, relaxed and fixed.
7.
Eviscerated carcasses will be placed in 10% buffered formalin and later cleared according to Hanken ans Wassersug (1981).
Following clearing frogs will be examined and the presence or absence of metacercaria noted.
Critical Data: 1.
Specific characterization of external deformities, 2.
Documentation of internal deformities, 3.
Histopathological findings for Minnesota frogs for comparison with Vermont frogs.
Statistical Treatment: The research sites will be selected from areas with at least 15% of the frogs affected in a sample of 100 frogs.
No specific statistical methods will be applied the data from this study.
Routine statistical methods may be applied to determine the frequencies of certain lesions and establish similarities between sites.
Assessment Criteria: Frogs will be examined for external and internal morphological and histological lesions and these lesions characterized and cataloged.
The lesions present in Vermont frogs in this study will compared to lesions in Minnesota frogs described by NWHC in 1996.
Funding and FTEs: Operational Costs: Salaries and benefits: (NWHC staff) Wildlife Disease Specialist FTE .05 Pathologist FTE .05 Travel for field work Sample shipment Field equipment/supplies Laboratory equipment/supplies Histological preparation and radiography Funding Source: $8,000 from USGS-BRD Quick Response Funds.
$ 5,000.00 1,000 200 350 450 1,000 Salaries are from NWHC base funding.
Project Investigators: Principal Investigators; Kathryn Converse, Ph.D., NWHC, Wildlife Disease Specialist Carol Meteyer, D.V.M., NWHC, Pathologist Laura Eaton-Poole, USFWS, Biologist Rick, Levey, Vermont Dept.
Environmental Conservation Biologist Special Safety Requirements: All necropsies and laboratory analysis will be conducted in a Level 3 bio-containment facility to protect sample purity, quality, and eliminate the potential for exposure to any human pathogens.
Protective clothing will be worn during examinations and goggles when handling formalin.
Follow standard operating procedure for use of euthanasia solution.
Completion Date: January 15, 1998 Schedule and milestones: General schedule: 6/9-13/97 7/7/97 7/21-30/97 9/1/97 12/15/97 1/15/98 Study Milestones: 1.
2.
3.
4.
5.
Complete Start key Complete Document Evaluate evaluation of field key to amphibian deformities to internal deformities comparative evaluation of Vermont and Minnesota frog deformities sites in Vermont with deformed frogs for use in this study.
effectiveness of diagnostic procedures and sample size and type for amphibians Visit sample sites in Vermont and review collection protocol with USFWS and VTDEC.
Ship coolers and supplies to Vermont Collect frogs, ship to NWHC and begin diagnostic evaluation Complete diagnostic tests Distribute first draft Distribute final report Relationship to Other Work: This study is supported by ongoing surveys of frog populations in Vermont conducted by the Environmental Agency of Vermont, Middlebury College (Middlebury Vermont), the US Fish and Wildlife Service and the US Environmental Protection Agency.
Expected Products: Key to internal deformities to allow for standardization of diagnostic findings.
Publication, BIB, 29 completion report and proposal for additional studies.
Literature Cited: Andrews, S. James.
1995.
A preliminary atlas of the reptiles and amphibians of Vermont.
Vermont Department of Fish and Wildlife, Natural Heritage Program.
64pp.
Hanken, James and R. Wassersug.
1981.
The visible skeleton.
Functional Photography 16:22-26, 44.
Ouellet, M., J. Bonin, J. Rodrique, J-L DesGranges and S. Lair. 1997.
Hindlimb deformities (ectromelia, ectrodactyly) in free-living anurans from agricultural habitats.
J. Wildlife Diseases 95-104.
Submitted by: ___________________________________________________________ Kathryn Converse, Wildlife Disease Specialist Date Principal Investigator Approved: ____________________________________________________________ Christopher Brand, Branch Chief Date Field Investigations Concurrence: ____________________________________________________________ Milton Friend Director, NWHC Date 30 Appendix D. Classification of Gross and Radiographic Findings in VT Frogs - 1997 Title CASE/AC 14895-002 14895-006 Deform ity Am elia Am elia/N o righ t isch ium /no rig ht pub is Side L/R /B Left Right Deformity Comment Initiation Appears Absent Th e iliu m is d isp lac ed ca ud ally.
Th e d ist al ilium has a rough, irregular cortex, flocculent trabeculae traversing the marrow and an abnorm al distal border.
Trabecular pattern instead of acetabulum/ No R is chiu m or pu bis 
Very sim ilar to 14895 -15 w/no left ischium or pub is an d R isch ium not fu sed with pub is All pelvic elements present 14895-015 Am elia/N o isch ium /No pub is Right 14896-007 14896-009 14898-003 Am elia/N o left isc hium /No left pu bis Am elia Am elia Left Right Right Initiation Incomplete Pattern Missing Distal Seg me nts 14895-004 14895-005 14895-005 14895-007 Hem imelia femur Hem imelia femur Brachydactyly/Skin Web Hem imelia Tibiale Fibulare Left Left Right Right with sm all narrow termination Digits 1 and 5 short malform ed (curled) brachydactyly (also left hemimelia) Abnorm al tibiale fibulare region/bones are abnormally wide cortices are very thin, the trabeculae give a light honeycomb app eara nce that is also p rese nt in a sho rt reg ion of p rox im al shaft of both tibiafibula bones.
Proximal cortex may be normal then cortica l 
Trabecular hypertrophy/ hyperplasia/ m od era te c ort ica l dis ru pti on / ni ce no rm al pelvis Midshaft trabecular hypert hyperplasa/mild cortica l disru ption /abru pt term ination with out disruption of cortical/trabecular pattern similar to 14896-03.
14895-010 H em im elia tib iaf ibu la Right 14895-011 14895-011 14895-012 Hem imelia Tibiale Fibulare H em im elia tib iaf ibu la Hem imelia femur Left Right Right 14895-013 He m im elia fem ur/n o left pu bis Left 14895-019 Hem imelia femur Right 14895-020 Hem imelia femur Left 31 Title CASE/AC Deform ity Side L/R /B Deformity Comment Initiation Incomplete Pattern Missing Distal Seg me nts 14895-021 H em im elia tib iaf ibu la Left Similar to 14895-20 /mid-shaft with mild trabe cular a nd c ortical d isrup tion w ith ab rup t termination w/out disrup tion of cortical/trabecular pattern No cortical or trabeculae disruption Pu bis m iss ing /di sta l fem ur wi th w ide co rtic al sha dow /sho rt tibfib segm ent w ith ver y sho rt proximal element 
Ve ry sim ilar to 14 895 -20 w ith m idsh aft trabecular hypertrophy hyperplasia mild rotation cortica l disru ption then dista l abru pt termination without cortical/trabecular change Tib iale an d fib ulare a re bo th ab norm al/sho rt with m ildly irregu lar corte x an d flocc ulent tra be cu lar a pp ea ran ce wi th a br up t sy m m etr ica l end to both bones.
Proximal limb is unremarkable/similar to 14898-017 Fem ur rotated with m ild trabecular disorganization cortex unremarkble/ Tibiafibula very short with disruption of trabecular and cortical pattern Trabecular 
Possible superimpose terminal dorsal rotation of distal 0.1 cm of Tib iale an d fib ulare a re bo th ab norm al/sho rt with m ildly irregu lar corte x an d flocc ulent tra be cu lar a pp ea ran ce wi th a br up t sy m m etr ica l end to both bones.
Proximal limb is Only very short (unfused? ) tibiafibula with no cortical or trabecular disruption.
14898-002 14898-005 14898-007 H em im elia tib iaf ibu la H em im elia l tib iaf ibu la H em im elia tib iaf ibu la Left Right Right Term inal bulge that may be bone s tructure Sh ort rem ain ing se gm en t is ab no rm al/n orm al proximal cortex with disorganization of terminal co rte x a nd tib iaf ibu la 14898-008 H em im elia tib iaf ibu la Left Short thick remaining segment like 14898-07 wi th n orm al p rox im al c ort ex an d te rm ina l disorganization-but mild.
Pe rio ste al re ac tion alon g s ha ft w ith dis tal wid enin g with delica te sp here of bo ne s im ilar to 14896 -010, (do histo) M uch like 14 898 -08 r adiog raph ically.
Tibiale and fibulare bones are short and end abruptly without cortical or trabecular disruption.
Fractures in tibiafibula and tibiale fibulare are thought to be artefacts.
Sh ort se gm en t of tib iaf ibu la ve ry s ho rt n orm al bone.
Silhouette proximally and then the terminal cortex became disorganized with increased trabecular pattern/distal femur is folded dorsally with increased disorganized trabecular pattern and a delicate dorsal bone 14897-017 Ad ac tyly Right 14897-022 H em im elia tib iaf ibu la Left 14898-009 Hem imelia femur Right 14898-011 14898-012 H em im elia tib iaf ibu la Ad ac tyly Right Bilateral 14898-014 H em im elia tib iaf ibu la Right Initiation Pa ttern Co mp lete but Missing Distal Elem ents 14895-001 Ectrodactyly/Brachydactyly/Skin Left Like 14895-018.
Abnormal tibiafibula (1/2 length) A bnorm al tibiale fibulare (1/2 len gth), dors al rotation prob ably trian gular tib fib; com plete w eb h ip to h ock; 3 incom plete d igits Like 14895-18 w/abn distal-mid-tibfib/skin we b hip to hoc k/ tibfib 1/2 len gth w /m idsh aft m ild d isr up tion of t rab ec ula e 
Tibiale fibu lare sh ort, bu t no tra bec ular d isrup tion/ tibiale now ap pears lateral.
No function hock joint w/medial dorsal rotation 180o 14895-008 Brachydactyly/ Rotation/Skin web Left 33 Title CASE/AC Deform ity Side L/R /B Deformity Comment Initiation Pa ttern Co mp lete but Missing Distal Elem ents 14895-009 Ec tro da ctyly Left Tib iale an d fib ulare s eem to beg in no rm ally w/a bru pt dis rup tion of trabe culae 
Ab norm al tibialefib ulare, one abn orm al digit much like 14895-009 Digit 4 m issing distal phalanges/2-4 also missing right hand Digit 1 missing.
Tibiafibula with disorganised trabecular pattern Ab norm al tibiale fib ulare/a bno rm al digits Abnorm al tibiafibula w/lateral rotation proximal to h oc k w /in cre as e a ss ym etr ica l cor tica l den sity alon g latera l side o f lateral ro tation, not defined as "bony bridge" no ossified tibiale fibulare/Abnormal digits with fusion of 3-4.
Ab norm al digits Abnorm al tibfib/with distal rotation/either tibiale or fibulare missing; the other is short and rotated/Digit #1 has abnorm al short irregular M-1 w ith indistinct Ph-2; Digit #2 and 3 are unremarkable.
Digit #4 has only short M-1 and there is no 5th d igit. 5 metatarsals present, but thick, short on digits 5, 4, 3.
Digit 2 only has metatarsus.
Digit 1 is unremarkable and remainder of limb is unremarkable.
Only 4 metatarsal present and the center 2 are fused.
Digit #1 has M-1 with short Ph-2 growing at a 90 degree angle medially with a short terminal Ph 2; Digit #3 has M-1 fused with Ph1, 2 and terminal 3; Digit 4 has M-1 Ph-1 and terminal Ph2.
Proximal limb is M etarsals all seem norm al and digits 1, 2, 3 have norm al pha lange s. D igits 4 a nd 5 hav e on ly metatarsus Ph1 and a terminal, poorly ossified Ph 2.
14895-014 Ec tro da ctyly /B rac hyd ac tyly Right 14895-016 14895-018 Ec tro da ctyly /B rac hyd ac tyly Ec tro da ctyly /B rac hyd ac tyly Left Left 14896-001 14896-004 14896-009 14897-001 14897-004 Ec tro da ctyly B rac hyd ac tyly Ec tro da ctyly Ec tro da ctyly Ectr oda ctyly/Bra chyd actyly/R otatio n/Skin Web Right Right Left Right Right 14897-005 14897-007 B rac hyd ac tyly Ectr oda ctyly/Bra chyd actyly/R otatio n/Skin Web Right Left 14897-015 Ec tro da ctyly /B rac hyd ac tyly Left 14897-016 Ec tro da ctyly Right 14897-018 B rac hyd ac tyly Right 34 Title CASE/AC Deform ity Side L/R /B Deformity Comment Initiation Pa ttern Co mp lete but Missing Distal Elem ents 14897-019 Ec tro da ctyly Right Only 3 digits ar present and these are abnormal/digits 1 and 3 have short M-1 and short terminal Ph 1; and the middle digit has a sh ort M -1 a nd sh ort Ph 1 a nd a s ho rt te rm ina l Digits 4 and 5 are unremarkable; digit 2 has small indistinct M-1 and small poorly ossified terminal Ph-1; the second digit has a split M-1 which appears to be webbed with skin covering digit 1; the lateral split of digit 2 M-1 has distinct Ph-1 and terminal Ph-2.
Resembles 14895-018.
Abnormal tibiale and fibu lare w ith dis tal 2/3 th ick w ith flocc ulent trabecular shadow filling marrow and very thin cortex dista lly.
Two digits a re pr esen t, bu t res em ble on ly th in s plic es of b on e; th e la ter al bone may have a terminal phalanx.
There are only 4 m etatarsal bones and the center 2 are fuse d. D igit #1 has a sh ort, term inal P h 1; The center fused metatarsi lead to two fused Ph 1 that split and each has a Ph 2 and a terminal Ph 3.
Digit 3 has a M-1, Ph 1 and a terminal Ph 2.
Ab norm al tibiale fib ulare a nd d igits; atte m pt at 3 small buds Ab norm al tibiale fib ulare a nd d igits; atte m pt at 3 small buds like 14898-06 Abnorm al tibiale fibulare; attempt a 1 digit like 148 95-0 9.
E ither tib iale or fib ulare m issin g bu t no cortical disruption in remaining bone 14897-020 Ec tro da ctyly Right 14897-021 Ec tro da ctyly Right 14897-023 Ec tro da ctyly Left 14898-001 14898-006 14898-010 Ec tro da ctyly Ec tro da ctyly Ec tro da ctyly Right Right Right Initiation with Completed Patte rn All segm ents p resen t and elem ents p resen t but Abn orm ality 14895-010 Abnorm al/Rotation/Bony bridge Left D ist al tib fib sh arp m ed ial b en d w ith m ed ial bony bridge that looks like it may have ori gin aly h av e b ee n p ers ist en t pe rio ste al band/possibly "folding" had start of "some triangle" with bridging of a bend/Skin W eb/d ram atic b end with traver sing bon ey Cutaneous fusion between normal digits 1 and 2 M id-femur large balbous cortical trabecular disruption all else normal wi th p eri os tea l rea ctio n a rou nd sti fle ( dis tal femur proximal tibiafibula) suggesting trauma (need histo).
14895-012 14895-017 14897-013 Abnorm al Abnorm al M icrom elia Left Left Left Runting/Body Composition 14896-011 Runted Bo th Vertebrae possibly compressed 35 Title Trauma CASE/AC Deform ity Side L/R /B Deformity Comment 14895-003 14896-008 Trauma Trauma Left Left Femur overiding fracture - no callous Leg s oft tiss ue s we lling, bu t deve lopm ent appears OK-radiographs show no abnormalities in pelvis or rear limbs.
Rear limb traum atic ampu tation Increased reaction around distal femur 
No fun ction to dista l limb sug gestin g trau m a.
T he e ntire lef t limb with m icrom elia 14897-003 14897-013 Trauma Trauma Right Left 36 APPENDIX E: ENLARGEMENTS OF REPORT TABLES AND RADIOGRAPHIC IMAGES 14895-003 14895-015 37 14896-003 14896-014 38 14896-013 14895-008 39 14895-018 14895-010 14895-010 Inset 40 41 AP PE ND IX F : TA BL E #1 Frog Bod y Co ndition /Ave rage b y De form ity TAB LE #2 Fr og B ody C ond ition/A verag e by C ollection Site Ap pend ix F is ava ilable by conta cting D r. Ca rol M eteyer at: National Wildlife Health Center 6006 Schroeder Road Madison, WI 53711 608-270-2400 42 APPENDIX G: HISTOPATHOLOGY FINDINGS Ap pend ix G is av ailable b y con tacting Dr. C arol M eteyer at: National Wildlife Health Center 6006 Schroeder Road Madison, WI 53711 608-270-2400 49 Appendix H. Bacterial Isolates from Liver and Kidneys VT 97 Isolation Acenitobacter baumanii Aeromonas hydrophila Aeromonas sp. Aeromonas veronii Alcaligenes sp. Alcaligenes xylosidans Bacillus cereus Bacillus sp. Citrobacter freundii Enterobacter agglomerans Enterobacter cloacae Enterobacter intermedium Enterobacter taylorae Enterococcus sp. Escherichia coli Escherichia sp. Escherichia vulneris Hafnia alvei Klebseilla pneumoniae Klebsiella group 47 Klyvera sp.
No Growth Pseudomonas cepacia Pseudomonas putida Pseudomonas sp. Serratia sp. Staphylococcus sp. Vibrio fluvialis Xanthamonas maltophilia 1 2 1 1 8 3 1 1 4 1 2 3 3 3 2 1 2 1 1 2 1 2 1 1 1 1 1 1 1 1 1 2 8 1 1 1 2 1 2 3 Alburg Dune Lap ans Bay 1 4 2 1 M issisq uo i NWR 1 2 1 3 Mud Creek Con trol Area 3 Poultney River 2 1 To tal Frogs 4 7 5 1 1 1 15 1 1 6 2 2 1 1 2 1 2 2 5 1 2 1 4 20 1 5 1 1 2 1 60 Appendix H. Metacercariae Identification in '97 Metamorphs Pancreas Head Eyes Intestinal Contents Lung er Liv Kidney Muscle Muscle/ skin interface Skin Tail bud Muscle Rear Leg Muscle Back Muscle Belly Muscle Body Cavity Stomach or Intest Serosa Urinary Bladder Esopha gus Heart /Peric ardial Hard Palate Fat Body Am elia/N o right isch ium /no righ t pub is 14895-006 Poultney River 14896-007 Alburg Dune U U U U U U U U U U U U U U Ec trod ac tyly/Bra ch yda ctyly 14895-016 Poultney River 14897-007 Missisquoi NWR 14898-006 Lapans Bay U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U He m im elia T ibiale F ibulare 14895-007 Poultney River 14896-006 Alburg Dune 14898-007 Lapans Bay U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U Normal 14895-022 Poultney River 14896-016 Alburg Dune 14897-024 Missisquoi NWR 14896-016 Lapans Bay 14899-006 Mud Creek WMA 14899-007 Mud Creek WMA U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U U 61 Appendix H. Adult Helminth Identification in '97 Metamorphs Isolation Gorgoderidae 2 2 1 5 Alburg Dune Lap ans Bay M issisq uo i NWR Mud Creek Con trol Area Poultney River To tal Frogs Nematode 1 2 1 1 5 Ox yur id 2 2 Rhabdias ranae 1 1 2 Trematode 1 1 2 4 62 APPENDIX I: LIMB M EASUREMENTS 1.
REAR LEG MEASUREM ENTS 2.
FRONT LEG MEASUREM ENTS Ap pend ix I is availab le by co ntactin g Dr .
Car ol M eteyer at: National Wildlife Health Center 6006 Schroeder Road Madison, WI 53711 608-270-2400 63 APPE NDIX J: References Cited BA LIN SK Y, B .
I. 1960.
D evelop men t of M esode rma l Orga ns in Ve rtebrate s. Cha pter 11 , An Intro duction to Embryology, W.B. Saunders Company, Philadelphia, London, pp 285-306.
----------------------- 1981.
Development of the Mesodermal Organs in Vertebrates, An Introduction to Embryology, Fifth Edition, Saunders College Publishing, Philadelphia, p. 465.
BOLA NDE , R. P. 1979.
Developmental Pathology.
American Journal of Pathology 94(3), pp 627-638.
CA RL SO N, B .
M. 19 94.
H um an Em bryo logy an d De velopm ental Bio logy.
C hapter 11, Lim b De velopm ent, MosbyYear Book, Inc. pp.182-203.
--------------- 1994.
H um an Em bryo logy an d De velopm ental Bio logy.
C hapter 8, De velopm ental D isorder s - Cau ses, Mechanisms, and Patterns, Mosby - Year Book, Inc. pp.117-133.
CO OK , T. W .
1978.
T he M igration o f Fibricola cratera (Trem atoda: Diplostomatidae ) in Metamorphosing Rana pipiens, The Journal of Parasitology, 64 (5), pp 938-939.
CU M M ING S, K .
S., C.
A .
Ma yer. 199 2.
Field g uide to F reshw ater M ussels of the Mid west.
C ham paign, Il. Illinois Natural History Survey.
CU NN ING HA M , A. A., T .
E. S. L AN GT ON , P. M .
BEN NE TT , J. F. LE W IN, S .
E. N .
DR UR Y, R .
E. GOU GH AN D S. .K. MACG REGO R. 1995.
Investigations into Unusual Mortalities of the Common Frog (Ran a temporaria ) in Britain.Zwart.
P. and G Matz, Editors, Fifth International Colloquium on the Pathology of Reptiles and Amphibians, Alphen Aan Den Run, The Netherlands pp.19-27.
----------------- 1996.
Pathological and microbiological findings from incidents of unusual mortality of the common frog (Ran a temp oraria ), Philosophical Transactions of the Royal Society of London Biological Sciences 351:15391557.
DICK MA N, S. 1997 Possible New Roles for HOX Genes.
Science 278:1882-1883.
DUB OIS, R. B. 1996.
Recent Observations of Deformed Anurans I Wisconsin, NAAM P III-The North American Amphibian Monitoring Program Third Annual Meeting: A meeting to present, evaluate, and discuss amphibian monitoring techniques for North America, World Wide W eb Conference, November 14, 1996-February 1997.
DU EL LM AN , W .
E. AN D L .
TRU EB .
1996.
B iology o f Am phibian s, The John H opkin s Un iversity P ress, Baltimore, pp. 173-192 and 289-414.
EL INS ON , R. 1997 .
Am phibian s. Em bryo logy: C onstru cting the O rganism , Sinau er As sociates, Inc .
Chap ter 20, pp. 409-436.
FR IED , B., P. L .
PAN E, A ND A. RE DD Y. 199 7.
Exp erim ental infectio n of Rana pipiens tadpoleswith Echinostom a trivolvis cercariae, Parasitol Res 83:666-669.
GILB ERS TO N, H ., R. DUB OIS, R .
HAY .
1998.
W isconsin's Am phibian M alformations: 1960-19 97.
Proceeding s of the M idwe st Dec lining A mp hibians C onfere nce M arch 2 0-21, 19 98.
HAD ORN, E. 1974.
Experimental Studies of Amphibian Development.
Translated by D. Turner.
Springer Berlag New York Heidelberg Berlin, pp. 114-131.
HAN KEN , J. AND R .
WASSE RUG. 1981.
The visible skeleton.
Functional photograph 15: 22- 24.
HO PPE , D. M .
1996.
H istorical O bserv ations an d Rec ent Sp ecies D iversity of D eform ed A nuran s in M inneso ta, NA AM P III - The Nor th Am erican A mp hibian M onitorin g Pro gram Third Ann ual M eeting: A mee ting to present, evaluate, and discuss amphibian monitoring techniques for North Am erica, World Wide W eb Conference, November 14, 1996-February 1997.
HIRD, DIESCH et al..
1983.
Applied Environmental Microbiology.
46:1423-1425.
M AR TIN , S. W ., A. H .
Me ek, P. W illeberg.
19 87.
Ve terinary epidem iology: p rinciples a nd m ethods .
1st ed. Am es, IA: Iow a State U niversity Press.
MA RTIN, T. R. AND D. B. CONN .
1990.
The Pathogenicity, Localization, and Cyst Structure of Echinostomatid Metacercariae (Trematoda) Infecting the Kidneys of the Fro gs RanaClamitans and Rana Pipiens, Journal of parasitology, 76(3) pp. 414-419.
70 References Cited Page 2 MEY ER-ROCH OW , V. B. AND J. KOEBKE.
1986.
A Study of Extra Extremity in a Five-legged Rana temporaria Frog.
Zoologischer Anzeiger 217: 1-13.
NIED ERR EITHE R, K., S. J. WARD , P. DOLL E, AND P. CHA MB ON. 1996.
M orphological and Molecular Characterization of Retinoic Acid-Induced Limb Duplications in Mice.
Developmental Biology 176, pp.185198.
O'RAHILLY .
R., MU LLER, F. 1996.
Human Embryology 
Pp. 1015.
O'SHEA , P. A. 1995.
Congenital Defects and Their Causes.
Human Reproduction: Growth and development, edited by D. R. Coustan, R. V. Haning, Jr., and D. B. Singer.
Chapter 8, pp. 121-138.
OU ELL ET, M ., J. BONIN , J. ROD RIQU E, J. L. DE SGR AN GE S, AN D S. L AIR. 1997 .
Hindlimb D eformities (Ectro melia, E ctroda ctyly) in F ree-living Anu rans fro m A gricultur al Hab itats, Journ al of W ildlife Disea se 33(1): pp. 95-104.
RE YN OL DS , T. D.
A ND T. D .
STE PH EN S. 198 4.
M ultiple Ec topic L imbs in a W ild Pop ulationo f Hyla Regilla .
Great Basin Naturalist 44: 166-169.
ROBBIN S, S. L., R. S. COTRAN , V. KUMA R. 1984.
Congenital malformations.
In Pathological Bases of Disease, S. L. Robbins, R. S. Cotran, V. Kumar (eds), W.B. Saunders Company, Philadelphia, PA, pp. 479482.
RU TLED GE , J. C., A. G. SHOURBA J I, L.A. HUGHE S, J. E. POLIFKA, T. P. CRUZ, J. B. BISH OP, a nd W. M GE NE RO SO .
1994.
L imb a nd low er-bod y dup lications indu ced by retinoic ac id in mic e. Proc eeds N ational Academy of Science, USA, Vol. 91, pp. 5436-5440.
SM ITH , D. M ., R. D .
TO RR ES , AN D T .
D. ST EP HE NS .
1996.
M esone phro s Has a Role in L imb D evelop men t and Is Related to Thalidomide Embryopathy.
Teratology 54: 126-134.
SE SS ION S, S. K .
AN D R UT H, S .
B. 199 0.
Exp lanation o f Natu rally O ccurr ing Su pernu mer ary L imbs in Amphibians, The Journal of Experimental Zoology 254:38-47.
VOGT , W., 1929.
Gestaltungsanalyse am Amphibienkeim mit ortlicher Vitalfarbung.
II.Gastrulation and Mesodermbildung bei Urodelen und Anuren.
Roux Arch.
120, 385-706.
W ISE , L. D., S .
L. BE CK , D. BE LT RA M E, B .
K. BE YE R, I. CH AH OU D, R .
L. CL AR K, R .CL AR K, A .
M .
DR UG A, M .
H. FE US TO N, P .
GU ITT IN, S .
M. H EN W OO D, C .
A. K IM M EL , P. LIN DS TR OM , A. K. PALME R, J. A. PETRERE , H. M. SOLOM ON, M.VA SUDA AND R. G. YORK. 1997.
Terminology of Developmental Abnormalities in Common Laboratory Mamm als (Version 1), Teratology 55: 249-292.
71 APPENDIX K: NECROPSY REPORTS Nec ropsy repor ts are av ailable b y con tacting Dr. C arol M eteyer at: National Wildlife Health Center 6006 Schroeder Road Madison, WI 53711 608-270-2400 72
